Hawaii statutes.
[§200-2.6] Ala
Wai boat harbor; leases. The fast lands and submerged lands of the
Ala Wai boat harbor that may be leased include the following:

(1) All fast lands and submerged lands described
in the request for qualifications or request for proposals issued by the
division of boating and ocean recreation of the department on November 25,
2008;

(2) The fast land described as a portion of tax map
key: (1) 2-3-37-12, composed of approximately 112,580 square feet, presently
used for harbor offices and permitted vehicular parking; and

(3) The fast land described as a portion of tax map
key: (1) 2-3-37-12, which is a triangular area located Diamond Head of Mole B,
presently used for permitted vehicular parking. [L 2011, c 197, §2]

Note

Requirement for leases. L 2011, c 197, §8.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next